parts/affixes.aff
# kaad => kwaders, boos=> bozers
SFX At Y 27
SFX At ob bers oob	ts:AJci
SFX At ad ders aad	ts:AJci
SFX At ed ders eed	ts:AJci
SFX At od ders ood	ts:AJci
SFX At af vers aaf	ts:AJci
SFX At of vers oof	ts:AJci
SFX At ag gers aag	ts:AJci
SFX At eg gers eeg	ts:AJci
SFX At og gers oog	ts:AJci
SFX At ak kers aak	ts:AJci
SFX At ek kers eek	ts:AJci
SFX At ok kers ook	ts:AJci
SFX At al lers aal	ts:AJci
SFX At el lers eel	ts:AJci
SFX At ol lers ool	ts:AJci
SFX At am mers aam	ts:AJci
SFX At om mers oom	ts:AJci
SFX At um mers uum	ts:AJci
SFX At an ners aan	ts:AJci
SFX At en ners een	ts:AJci
SFX At on ners oon	ts:AJci
SFX At es sers ees	ts:AJci
SFX At at ters aat	ts:AJci
SFX At et ters eet	ts:AJci
SFX At ot ters oot	ts:AJci
SFX At os zers oos	ts:AJci
SFX At us sers uus	ts:AJci

# lief => lievers
SFX Au Y 2
SFX Au f vers f	ts:AJci
SFX Au s zers s	ts:AJci

# zwak => zwakkers
SFX Av Y 11
SFX Av 0 ders d	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 fers f	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 gers g	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 kers k	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 lers l	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 mers m	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 ners n	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 pers p	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 rers r	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 sers s	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 ters t	ts:AJci

# lelijk => lelijkers, raar => raarders
SFX Aw Y 2
SFX Aw 0 ers [^r]	ts:AJci
SFX Aw 0 ders r	ts:AJci

# kaad => kwadere, boos=> bozere
SFX Ax Y 27
SFX Ax ob bere oob	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ad dere aad	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ed dere eed	ts:AJce
SFX Ax od dere ood	ts:AJce
SFX Ax af vere aaf	ts:AJce
SFX Ax of vere oof	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ag gere aag	ts:AJce
SFX Ax eg gere eeg	ts:AJce
SFX Ax og gere oog	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ak kere aak	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ek kere eek	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ok kere ook	ts:AJce
SFX Ax al lere aal	ts:AJce
SFX Ax el lere eel	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ol lere ool	ts:AJce
SFX Ax am mere aam	ts:AJce
SFX Ax om mere oom	ts:AJce
SFX Ax um mere uum	ts:AJce
SFX Ax an nere aan	ts:AJce
SFX Ax en nere een	ts:AJce
SFX Ax on nere oon	ts:AJce
SFX Ax es sere ees	ts:AJce
SFX Ax at tere aat	ts:AJce
SFX Ax et tere eet	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ot tere oot	ts:AJce
SFX Ax os zere oos	ts:AJce
SFX Ax us sere uus	ts:AJce
